Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, HB4023.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Section 15-701, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended to read: START_STATUTE15-701. Common schools; promotions; requirements; certificate; supervision of eighth grades by superintendent of high school district; high school admissions; academic credit; definitions A. The state board of education shall: 1. Prescribe a minimum course of study incorporating the academic standards adopted by the state board of education to be taught in the common schools.  The academic standards prescribed by the state board in social studies must include ethnic studies. 2. Prescribe competency requirements for the promotion of pupils from the eighth grade and competency requirements for the promotion of pupils from the third grade that incorporate the academic standards in at least the areas of reading, writing, mathematics, science and social studies.  The competency requirements for the promotion of pupils from the third grade shall include the following: (a) A requirement that a pupil not be promoted from the third grade if the pupil obtains a score on the reading portion of the statewide assessment that does not demonstrate sufficient reading skills as established by the state board. A pupil may not be retained pursuant to this subdivision if data regarding the pupil's performance on the statewide assessment is not available before the end of the current academic year and may not be retained more than once.  A pupil who is not retained due to the unavailability of test data must receive evidence-based intervention and remedial strategies pursuant to subdivision (c) of this paragraph if the third grade assessment data subsequently does not demonstrate sufficient reading skills. (b) A mechanism to allow a school district governing board or charter school governing body to promote from the third grade a pupil who does not demonstrate sufficient reading skills pursuant to subdivision (a) of this paragraph if the pupil: (i) Is an English learner or a limited English proficient student as defined in section 15-751 and has had fewer than three years of English language instruction. (ii) Is in the process of a special education referral or evaluation for placement in special education, has been diagnosed as having a significant reading impairment, including dyslexia, or is a child with a disability as defined in section 15-761 if the pupil's individualized education program team and the pupil's parent or guardian agree that promotion is appropriate based on the pupil's individualized education program. (iii) Has demonstrated or subsequently demonstrates sufficient reading skills or adequate progress toward sufficient reading skills of the third grade reading standards as evidenced through a collection of reading assessments approved by the state board of education, which includes an alternative standardized reading assessment approved by the state board. (iv) Receives intervention and remedial services during the summer or a subsequent school year pursuant to subdivision (c) of this paragraph and demonstrates sufficient progress based on guidelines issued pursuant to subsection B, paragraph 7 of this section. (c) Evidence-based intervention and remedial strategies developed by the state board of education for pupils who are not promoted from the third grade. A school district governing board or charter school governing body shall offer more than one of the intervention and remedial strategies developed by the state board of education. The parent or guardian of a pupil who is not promoted from the third grade and the pupil's teacher and principal may choose the most appropriate intervention and remedial strategies that will be provided to that pupil. The intervention and remedial strategies developed by the state board of education shall include: (i) A requirement that the pupil be assigned for evidence-based reading instruction by a different teacher who was designated in that teacher's most recent performance evaluation in one of the top two performance classifications. (ii) Summer school reading instruction. (iii) In the next academic year, intensive reading instruction that occurs before, during or after the regular school day, or any combination of before, during and after the regular school day. (iv) Small group and teacher-led evidence-based reading instruction, which may include computer-based or online reading instruction. (d) A requirement that a school district governing board or charter school governing body that promotes a pupil pursuant to subdivision (b) of this paragraph provide annual reporting to the department of education on or before October 1 that includes information on the total number of pupils subject to the retention provisions of subdivision (a) of this paragraph, the total number of students promoted pursuant to subdivision (b) of this paragraph, the total number of pupils retained in grade three and the interventions administered pursuant to subdivision (c) of this paragraph. 3. Provide for universal screening of pupils in preschool programs, kindergarten programs and grades one through three that is designed to identify pupils who have reading deficiencies pursuant to section 15-704. 4. Develop evidence-based intervention and remedial strategies pursuant to paragraph 2, subdivision (c) of this subsection for pupils in kindergarten programs and grades one through three who are identified as having reading deficiencies pursuant to section 15-704. 5. Distribute guidelines for the school districts to follow in prescribing criteria for the promotion of pupils from grade to grade in the common schools. These guidelines shall include recommended procedures for ensuring that the cultural background of a pupil is taken into consideration when criteria for promotion are being applied. B. School districts and charter schools shall provide annual written notification to parents of pupils in kindergarten programs and first, second and third grades that a pupil who does not demonstrate sufficient reading skills pursuant to subsection A of this section will not be promoted from the third grade. School districts and charter schools shall identify each pupil who is at risk of reading below grade level in kindergarten and grades one, two and three and shall provide to the parent of that pupil a specific written notification of the reading deficiency within three weeks after identifying the reading deficiency. The notification shall include the following information: 1. A description of the pupil's specific individual needs. 2. A description of the current reading services provided to the pupil. 3. A description of the available supplemental instructional services and supporting programs that are designed to remediate reading deficiencies.  Each school district or charter school shall offer more than one evidence-based intervention strategy and more than one remedial strategy developed by the state board of education for pupils with reading deficiencies. The notification shall list the intervention and remedial strategies offered and shall instruct the parent to choose, in consultation with the pupil's teacher, the most appropriate strategies to be provided and implemented for that child. 4. Parental strategies to assist the pupil to attain reading proficiency. 5. The frequency with which the school district or charter school will provide timely updates and information to the parent on the pupil's progress toward reading proficiency. 6. A statement that the pupil will not be promoted from the third grade if the pupil does not demonstrate sufficient reading skills pursuant to subsection A, paragraph 2, subdivision (a) of this section, unless the pupil is exempt from mandatory retention in grade three or the pupil qualifies for an exemption pursuant to subsection A, paragraph 2, subdivision (b) of this section. 7. A description of the school district or charter school policies on midyear promotion to a higher grade. C. Pursuant to the guidelines that the state board of education distributes, the governing board of a school district shall: 1. Prescribe curricula that include the academic standards in the required subject areas pursuant to subsection A, paragraph 1 of this section. 2. Prescribe criteria for the promotion of pupils from grade to grade in the common schools in the school district. These criteria shall include accomplishment of the academic standards in at least reading, writing, mathematics, science and social studies, as determined by district assessment. Other criteria may include additional measures of academic achievement and attendance. D. The governing board may prescribe the course of study and competency requirements for promotion that are in addition to or higher than the course of study and competency requirements the state board prescribes. E. A teacher shall determine whether to promote or retain a pupil in a grade in a common school on the basis of the prescribed criteria.  The governing board, if it reviews the decision of a teacher to promote or retain a pupil in a grade in a common school as provided in section 15-342, paragraph 11, shall base its decision on the prescribed criteria. F. A governing board may provide and issue certificates of promotion to pupils whom it promotes from the eighth grade of a common school. Such certificates shall be signed by the principal or superintendent of schools. If there is no principal or superintendent of schools, the certificates shall be signed by an eighth grade teacher. The certificates shall admit the holders to any high school in this state. G. Within any high school district or union high school district, the superintendent of the high school district shall supervise the work of the eighth grade of all schools that do not employ a superintendent or principal. H. A school district shall not deny a pupil who is between the ages of sixteen and twenty-one years admission to a high school because the pupil does not hold an eighth grade certificate. Governing boards shall establish procedures for determining the admissibility of pupils who are under sixteen years of age and who do not hold eighth grade certificates. I. The state board of education shall adopt rules to allow common school pupils who can demonstrate competency in a particular academic course or subject to obtain academic credit for the course or subject without enrolling in the course or subject. J. A school district may conduct a ceremony to honor pupils who have been promoted from the eighth grade. K. For the purposes of this section: , 1. "Dyslexia" means a condition that: 1. (a) Is neurological in origin. 2. (b) Is characterized by difficulties with accurate or fluent word recognition and by poor spelling and decoding abilities, including difficulties that typically result from a deficit in the phonological component of language that is often unexpected in relation to other cognitive abilities and to the provision of effective classroom instruction. 3. (c) May include secondary consequences such as problems with reading comprehension and reduced reading experience that may impede the growth of vocabulary and background knowledge. 2. "Ethnic studies": (a) means the interdisciplinary social and historical study of how different populations have experienced and participated in building the United States of America. (b) Includes the study of the culture, history and contribution of residents of this state from diverse ethnic backgrounds. END_STATUTE Sec. 2. Section 15-701.01, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended to read: START_STATUTE15-701.01. High schools; graduation; requirements; community college or university courses; transfer from other schools; academic credit; report A. The state board of education shall: 1. Prescribe a minimum course of study that incorporates the academic standards adopted by the state board for the graduation of pupils from high school. 2. Prescribe competency requirements for the graduation of pupils from high school incorporating the academic standards in at least the areas of reading, writing, mathematics, science and social studies. The academic standards prescribed by the state board in social studies shall must include ethnic studies as defined in section 15-701, personal finance, American civics education and a comparative discussion of political ideologies, such as communism and totalitarianism, that conflict with the principles of freedom and democracy that are essential to the founding principles of the United States. The state board may consider establishing a required separate personal finance course for the purpose of the graduation of pupils from high school. The state board shall require at least one-half of a course credit in economics, which shall include financial literacy and personal financial management. 3. Through the graduating class of 2025, include in the competency requirements for social studies prescribed in paragraph 2 of this subsection a requirement that, in order to graduate from high school or obtain a high school equivalency diploma, a pupil must correctly answer at least sixty of the one hundred questions listed on a test that is identical to the civics portion of the naturalization test used by the United States citizenship and immigration services. Beginning with the graduating class of 2026, the state board shall include in the competency requirements for social studies prescribed in paragraph 2 of this subsection a requirement that, in order to graduate from high school or obtain a high school equivalency diploma, a pupil must correctly answer at least seventy of the one hundred questions listed on a test that is identical to the civics portion of the naturalization test used by the United States citizenship and immigration services.  A district school or charter school shall document on the pupil's transcript only a pass or fail designation that the pupil has passed or failed the test required by this paragraph. A pupil in grade seven or eight may take the test described in this paragraph, and if the pupil correctly answers at least seventy of the one hundred questions on the test: (a) The district school or charter school shall document on the pupil's transcript only a pass or fail designation that the pupil has passed or failed the test required by this paragraph. (b) The pupil is not required to take the test required by this paragraph again in high school. 4. Develop and adopt competency tests pursuant to section 15-741.  English language learners who are subject to article 3.1 of this chapter are subject to the assessments prescribed in section 15-741. B. The governing board of a school district shall: 1. Prescribe curricula that include the academic standards in the required subject areas pursuant to subsection A, paragraph 1 of this section. 2. Prescribe criteria for the graduation of pupils from the high schools in the school district. These criteria shall include accomplishment of the academic standards in at least reading, writing, mathematics, science and social studies, as determined by district assessment. Other criteria may include additional measures of academic achievement and attendance. Pursuant to the prescribed graduation requirements adopted by the state board of education, the governing board may approve a rigorous computer science course that would fulfill a mathematics course required for graduation from high school. The governing board may approve a rigorous computer science course only if the rigorous computer science course includes significant mathematics content and the governing board determines the high school where the rigorous computer science course is offered has sufficient capacity, infrastructure and qualified staff, including competent teachers of computer science.  The school district governing board or charter school governing body may determine the method and manner in which to administer a test that is identical to the civics portion of the naturalization test used by the United States citizenship and immigration services.  A pupil who does not obtain a passing score on the test that is identical to the civics portion of the naturalization test may retake the test until the pupil obtains a passing score. C. The governing board may prescribe the course of study and competency requirements for the graduation of pupils from high school that are in addition to or higher than the course of study and competency requirements that the state board prescribes. D. The governing board may prescribe competency requirements for the passage of pupils in courses that are required for graduation from high school. E. A teacher shall determine whether to pass or fail a pupil in a course in high school on the basis of the competency requirements, if any have been prescribed. The governing board, if it reviews the decision of a teacher to pass or fail a pupil in a course in high school as provided in section 15-342, paragraph 11, shall base its decision on the competency requirements, if any have been prescribed. F. Graduation requirements established by the governing board may be met by a pupil who passes courses in the required or elective subjects at a community college or university, if the course is at a higher level than the course taught in the high school attended by the pupil or, if the course is not taught in the high school, the level of the course is equal to or higher than the level of a high school course. The governing board shall determine whether the subject matter of the community college or university course is appropriate to the specific requirement the pupil intends it to fulfill and whether the level of the community college or university course is less than, equal to or higher than a high school course, and the governing board shall award at least one-half of a Carnegie unit and up to and including one Carnegie unit for each three semester hours of credit that the pupil earns in an appropriate community college or university course. If a pupil is not satisfied with the decision of the governing board regarding the amount of credit granted or the subjects for which credit is granted, the pupil may request that the state board of education review the decision of the governing board, and the state board shall make the final determination of the amount of credit to be given the pupil and for which subjects. The governing board shall not limit the number of credits that is required for high school graduation and that may be met by taking community college or university courses.  For the purposes of this subsection: 1. "Community college" means an educational institution that is operated by a community college district as defined in section 15-1401 or a postsecondary educational institution under the jurisdiction of an Indian tribe recognized by the United States department of the interior. 2. "University" means a university under the jurisdiction of the Arizona board of regents. G. A pupil who transfers from a private school shall be provided with a list that indicates those credits that have been accepted and denied by the school district. A pupil may request to take an examination in each particular course in which credit has been denied. The school district shall accept the credit for each particular course in which the pupil takes an examination and receives a passing score on a test designed and evaluated by a teacher in the school district who teaches the subject matter on which the examination is based. In addition to the above requirements, the governing board of a school district may prescribe requirements for the acceptance of the credits of pupils who transfer from a private school. H. If a pupil who was previously enrolled in a charter school or school district enrolls in a school district in this state, the school district shall accept credits earned by the pupil in courses or instructional programs at the charter school or school district. The governing board of a school district may adopt a policy concerning the application of transfer credits for the purpose of determining whether a credit earned by a pupil who was previously enrolled in a school district or charter school will be assigned as an elective or core credit. A school district or charter school may note the learning outcomes that a student mastered as prescribed in the rules adopted pursuant to section 15-203, subsection A, paragraph 38 to provide a record of the demonstrated competencies and award partial credit. I. A pupil who transfers credit from a charter school, a school district or Arizona online instruction shall be provided with a list that indicates which credits have been accepted as elective credits and which credits have been accepted as core credits by the school district or charter school. Within ten school days after receiving the list, the pupil may request to take an examination in each particular course in which core credit has been denied. The school district or charter school shall accept the credit as a core credit for each particular course in which the pupil takes an examination and receives a passing score on a test that is aligned to the competency requirements adopted pursuant to this section and that is designed and evaluated by a teacher in the school district or charter school who teaches the subject matter on which the examination is based. If a pupil is enrolled in a school district or charter school and that pupil also participates in Arizona online instruction between May 1 and July 31, the school district or charter school shall not require proof of payment as a condition of the school district or charter school accepting credits earned from the online course provider. J. The state board of education shall adopt rules to allow high school pupils who can demonstrate competency in a particular academic course or subject to obtain academic credit for the course or subject without enrolling in the course or subject. K. Pupils who earn a Grand Canyon diploma pursuant to article 6 of this chapter are exempt from the graduation requirements prescribed in this section. Pupils who earn a Grand Canyon diploma are entitled to all the rights and privileges of persons who graduate with a high school diploma issued pursuant to this section, including access to postsecondary scholarships and other forms of student financial aid and access to all forms of postsecondary education.  Notwithstanding any other law, a pupil who is eligible for a Grand Canyon diploma may elect to remain in high school through grade twelve and shall not be prevented from enrolling at a high school after the pupil becomes eligible for a Grand Canyon diploma. A pupil who is eligible for a Grand Canyon diploma and who elects not to pursue one of the options prescribed in section 15-792.03 may only be readmitted to that high school or another high school in this state pursuant to policies adopted by the school district of readmission. L. Each school district and charter school shall report to the department of education all of the following aggregate data, organized by grade level, relating to the test that is identical to the civics portion of the naturalization test used by the United States citizenship and immigration services required by subsection A, paragraph 3 of this section: 1. The median score. 2. The percentage of pupils who passed by correctly answering the minimum number of questions required to pass the test pursuant to subsection A, paragraph 3 of this section. 3. The percentage of pupils who failed by correctly answering fewer than the minimum number of questions required to pass the test pursuant to subsection A, paragraph 3 of this section. 4. Any other data required by the department relating to the test. M. A school district or charter school may not include the personally identifiable information of any pupil in the data reported to the department of education under subsection L of this section. The department of education shall make the data publicly available, organized at a minimum by school district or charter school and grade level, on the website that includes the school report cards required by section 15-746. END_STATUTE Sec. 3. Ethnic studies commission; members; state board of education; duties; delayed repeal A. The ethnic studies commission is established to review the contributions of residents of this state from diverse ethnic backgrounds and to make recommendations to the state board of education for prescribing academic standards in social studies that include ethnic studies as defined in section 15-701, Arizona Revised Statutes, as amended by this act.   The commission is composed of the following members: 1. Five members of the senate who are appointed by the president of the senate, not more than three of whom are members of the same political party.  The president of the senate shall designate one of the members to serve as cochairperson of the commission. 2. Five members of the house of representatives who are appointed by the speaker of the house of representatives, not more than three of whom are members of the same political party.  The speaker of the house of representatives shall designate one of the members to serve as cochairperson of the commission. 3. Two members who are appointed by the governor. B. Commission members are not eligible to receive compensation but are eligible for reimbursement of expenses pursuant to title 38, chapter 4, article 2, Arizona Revised Statutes. Meetings of the commission are subject to the requirements of title 38, chapter 3, article 3.1, Arizona Revised Statutes.  The state board of education shall provide staff and meeting space for the commission. C. The commission shall: 1. Review the history and contributions of residents of this state who are from diverse ethnic backgrounds. 2. Make recommendations for recognizing the contributions of residents of this state who are from diverse ethnic backgrounds. 3. Review proposed academic standards that are submitted to the commission by the state board of education pursuant to subsection E of this section. 4. Make recommendations to the state board of education for incorporating ethnic studies as defined in section 15-701, Arizona Revised Statutes, as amended by this act, into the academic standards in social studies. D. The commission may establish subcommittees to assist the commission in performing any of the duties prescribed by subsection C of this section.  A subcommittee established pursuant to this subsection may include members of the public who represent a community organization, public schools or the general public. E. Before prescribing academic standards in social studies that include ethnic studies as defined in section 15-701, Arizona Revised Statutes, as amended by this act, the state board of education shall: 1. Submit to the ethnic studies commission established by this section a draft of the proposed academic standards for review and recommendations. 2. Consider all of the following: (a) Existing academic standards that increase cultural awareness of all communities in this state. (b) Opportunities to recognize and incorporate into the ethnic studies requirements the history, contributions and perspectives of residents of this state who are from diverse ethnic backgrounds. (c) Recommendations from the ethnic studies commission established by this section. F. Not later than January 1, 2028, the state board of education shall: 1. Prescribe academic standards in social studies that include ethnic studies as defined in section 15-701, Arizona Revised Statutes, as amended by this act. 2. Develop guidelines to support public schools in developing curricula that includes the academic standards prescribed pursuant to paragraph 1 of this subsection. 3. Provide professional development training and resources on ethnic studies as defined in section 15-701, Arizona Revised Statutes, as amended by this act, to certificated teachers in this state who provide instruction in social studies to students in kindergarten programs or any of grades one through twelve. G. Beginning in the 2028-2029 school year, each school district and charter school shall prescribe curricula that include the academic standards prescribed pursuant to subsection F of this section and that focus on shared identity and honoring unique cultural differences, including: 1. That each individual student has unique characteristics. 2. The common elements that unite residents of this state. 3. Respect for distinct socio-cultural identities. 4. Cultural histories within American history and global history. H. This section is repealed from and after December 31, 2030.